Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-105
Books; injury or failure to return; penalty.

If any person injures or fails to return any book taken from the library, he shall forfeit and pay to the librarian for the use of the library, double the value of the book, or of the set to which it belongs, if a set is broken by its loss, to be recovered in an action in the name of the state. Before the Director of Administrative Services shall issue his warrant in favor of any person authorized to take books from the library, for the value of his services or amount of his salary, he shall be satisfied that such person has returned all books taken from the library, or settled for the same; otherwise he shall deduct all accounts for the detention or injury of such books.

Laws 1871, § 7, p. 53;

R.S.1913, § 3782;

C.S.1922, § 3175;

C.S.1929, § 51-105;

R.S.1943, § 51-105.